Utah statutes.
72-1-205.   Region offices -- Region directors -- Qualifications -- Responsibilities.

(1)  The department shall maintain region offices throughout the state as the executive director finds reasonable and necessary for the efficient carrying out of the duties of the department.

(2)  The executive director shall appoint a region director for each region.  Each region director shall be a qualified executive with technical and administrative experience and training.

(3)  The region director is responsible for:

(a)  executing department policy within the region;

(b)  supervising project development and operations of the state transportation systems within the region; and

(c)  promoting the department's public involvement and information programs.

(4)  The executive director may also establish district offices within a region to implement maintenance, encroachment, safety, community involvement, and loss management functions of the region.

